Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 85.67, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. The attorney general shall appoint a staff member to represent the treasurer of state and the fund in all proceedings and matters arising under this subchapter . The attorney general shall be reimbursed up to four hundred fifty nine hundred thousand dollars annually from the fund for services provided related to the fund. The commissioner of Senate File 2467, p. 2 insurance shall consider the reimbursement to the attorney general as an outstanding liability when making a determination of funding availability under section 85.65A, subsection 2 . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2467, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor